Connecticut, session 2026, SB00210.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 17b of the general statutes be amended to require the
Commissioner of Social Services to (1) amend the Medicaid state plan to
increase reimbursement rates for pediatric care services by not less than
five per cent higher than such rates in effect on June 30, 2026, and (2) file
a report on the impact of such rate increases on provider participation
in the Medicaid program, access to care and the state budget.